District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

3-635

Sunset.

Expired.

History

Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-151, § 6, 53 DCR 5368

Editor's Notes

This chapter, consisting of §§ 3-631 to 3-635, expired on December 31, 2008, pursuant to section 6 of D.C. Law 16-151.